Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.660

First-class districts having city with population of 400,000 people or more—Boundaries of director districts—Candidate eligibility—Declaration of candidacy—Primary limited to district voters—Terms of directors.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any school district of the first class having within its boundaries a city with a population of four hundred thousand people or more shall be divided into seven director districts. The boundaries of such director districts shall be established by the members of the school board, such boundaries to be established so that each such district shall comply, as nearly as practicable, with the criteria established in RCW 29A.76.010. Boundaries of such director districts shall be adjusted by the school board following the procedure established in RCW 29A.76.010 after each federal decennial census if population change shows the need thereof to comply with the criteria of RCW 29A.76.010. No person shall be eligible for the position of school director in any such director district unless such person resides in the particular director district. Residents in the particular director district desiring to be a candidate for school director shall file their declarations of candidacy for such director district and for the position of director in that district and shall be voted upon, in any primary required to be held for the position under Title 29A RCW, by the registered voters of that particular director district. In the general election, each position shall be voted upon by all the registered voters in the school district. The order of the names of candidates shall appear on the primary and general election ballots as required for nonpartisan positions under Title 29A RCW. Except as provided in RCW 28A.343.670, every such director so elected in school districts divided into seven director districts shall serve for a term of four years as otherwise provided in RCW 28A.343.610.

[ 2015 c 53 s 14. Prior: 1991 c 363 s 28; 1991 c 288 ss 5, 6; prior: 1990 c 59 s 99; 1990 c 33 s 327; 1979 ex.s. c 183 s 6; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 21 s 5; 1969 c 131 s 9. Formerly RCW 28A.315.670, 28A.57.425.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1991 c 363 ss 28, 29, 33, 47, and 131: "(1) Sections 28, 29, 33, and 131 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1992.

(2) Section 47 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1991 c 363 s 165.]

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Effective date—1991 c 288 ss 6 and 8: "Sections 6 and 8 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1992." [ 1991 c 288 s 12.]

Expiration date—1991 c 288 ss 5 and 7: "Sections 5 and 7 of this act shall expire July 1, 1992." [ 1991 c 288 s 11.]

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 183: See notes following RCW 28A.343.020.